Ohio, session 136, HB187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3313.601 of the Revised Code be 4
amended to read as follows: 5
Sec. 3313.601. The board of education of each school 6
district may shall provide for a moment of silence each school 7
day for prayer, reflection, or meditation upon a moral, 8
philosophical, or patriotic theme. No board of education, 9
school, or employee of the school district shall require a pupil 10
to participate in a moment of silence provided for pursuant to 11
this section. No board of education shall prohibit a classroom 12
teacher from providing in the teacher's classroom reasonable 13
periods of time for activities of a moral, philosophical, or 14
patriotic theme. No pupil shall be required to participate in 15
such activities if they are contrary to the religious 16
convictions of the pupil or the pupil's parents or guardians. 17
No board of education of a school district shall adopt any 18
policy or rule respecting or promoting an establishment of 19

H. B. No. 187 Page 2
As Introduced
religion or prohibiting any pupil from the free, individual, and 20
voluntary exercise or expression of the pupil's religious 21
beliefs in any primary or secondary school. 22
Section 2. That existing section 3313.601 of the Revised 23
Code is hereby repealed. 24